test/src/morphology/V-kapajash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


    Verb - капаяш: # Verb-em 'dig'
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: капаем
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: капает
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: капая
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: капаенӓ
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: капаедӓ
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: капаят
     
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: капайы
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: капаеп
#    
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: капайышым
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: капайышыц
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: капайыш
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: капайышна
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: капайышда
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: капаевӹ
    
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: капайы
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: капаеп
#    
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: капаенӓм
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: капаенӓт
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: капаен
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: капаеннӓ
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: капаендӓ
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: капаенӹт
    
##   
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: капайыделам
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg2: капайыделат
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: капайыде 
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: капайыделна
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl2: капайыделда
     капаяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: капайыделыт
##   
     капаяш+V+Imprt+Sg2: капайы
     капаяш+V+Imprt+Sg3: капайыжы
     капаяш+V+Imprt+Pl2: капайыда
     капаяш+V+Imprt+Pl3: капайышты
##   
     капаяш+V+ImprtII+Sg2: капаемӓ
     капаяш+V+ImprtII+Pl2: капаемӓдӓ
##   
     капаяш+V+Des+Sg1: капайынем
     капаяш+V+Des+Sg2: капайынет
     капаяш+V+Des+Sg3: капайынежӹ
     капаяш+V+Des+Pl1: капайыненӓ
     капаяш+V+Des+Pl2: капайынедӓ
     капаяш+V+Des+Pl3: капайынештӹ
